Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2232YH (1) 91 ll/ns H.F. 693 Section 1. Section 15E.311, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. âCharitable organizationâ means an organization located 3 in this state that is described in section 501(c)(3) of the 4 Internal Revenue Code that is exempt from taxation under 5 section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code or an organization 6 located in this state that is established for a charitable 7 purpose. 8 Sec. 2. Section 633.358, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 9 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 10 If a charitable organization , as defined in section 11 15E.311 , is a beneficiary of an interest in property created 12 by beneficiary designation, that charitable organization may 13 present an affidavit to the holder of the property or to any 14 person with information about the property for the purpose of 15 obtaining the property or information regarding the property. 16 The affidavit shall state all of the following: 17 Sec. 3. Section 633.358, subsection 2, paragraph d, Code 18 2025, is amended to read as follows: 19 d. The charitable organization is a charitable organization 20 as defined in section 15E.311 an organization that is described 21 in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that is 22 exempt from taxation under section 501(a) of the Internal 23 Revenue Code or an organization that is established for a 24 charitable purpose . 25